Nebraska, session 109, LB538A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB538A LB538A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $138,227 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $137,431 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the State Department of Education, for Program 25, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 538, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $66,197
for FY2025-26 or $68,348 for FY2026-27.
-2-